Montana, session 2025, HB188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 5-5-211, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-5-211. Appointment and composition of interim committees. (1) Senate interim committee
members must be appointed by the committee on committees.
(2) House interim committee members must be appointed by the speaker of the house with advice
from the minority leader.
(3) Appointments to interim committees must be made by the time of adjournment of the legislative
session.
(4) A legislator may not serve on more than two interim committees unless no other legislator is
available or is willing to serve.
(5) (a) Subject to 5-5-234 and subsection subsections (5)(b) through (5)(d) of this section, the
composition of each interim committee must be as follows:
(i) four members of the house, three from the majority party and one from the minority party; and
(ii) four members of the senate, three from the majority party and one from the minority party.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 188

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 188.1
(b) For each chamber, the total number of appointments to interim committees must reflect the
majority and minority composition of that chamber.
(b)(c) Subject to subsection (5)(c), if If the committee workload requires, the legislative council may
request the appointing authority to appoint one or two additional interim committee members from the majority
party and the minority party.
(c) If additional members are appointed, members must be appointed in a manner that reflects the
majority and minority composition of the legislature.
(d) An interim committee may not have a majority of its members be from the minority party.
(6) The membership of the interim committees must be provided for by legislative rules. The rules
must identify the committees from which members are selected, and the appointing authority shall attempt to
select not less than 50% of the members from the standing committees that consider issues within the
jurisdiction of the interim committee and at least one member from the joint subcommittee that considers the
related agency budgets. In making the appointments, the appointing authority shall take into account term limits
of members so that committee members will be available to follow through on committee activities and
recommendations in the next legislative session.
(7) An interim committee, the environmental quality council, or the modernization and risk analysis
committee may create subcommittees. Nonlegislative members may serve on a subcommittee. Unless the
person is a full-time salaried officer or employee of the state or a political subdivision of the state, a
nonlegislative member appointed to a subcommittee or to the modernization and risk analysis committee is
entitled to salary and expenses to the same extent as a legislative member. If the appointee is a full-time
salaried officer or employee of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, the appointee is entitled to
reimbursement for travel expenses as provided for in 2-18-501 through 2-18-503."

Section 2. Section 5-5-234, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-5-234. Appointments. (1) (a) Whenever a legislative appointing authority is required or authorized
to appoint more than one legislative member of the majority party to a committee, subcommittee, or other
statutorily recognized or authorized entity, the appointing authority may appoint a member of a party other than
the majority party.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 188

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 188.1
(b) Whenever a legislative appointing authority is required or authorized to appoint more than one
legislative member of the minority party to a committee, subcommittee, other statutorily recognized or
authorized entity, the appointing authority may, if requested by the minority leader, appoint a member of a party
other than the minority party or majority party instead of a member of the minority party.
(2) (a) Whenever an elected state official, as defined in 5-7-102, is required or authorized to
appoint more than one legislative member of the majority party to a statutorily recognized or authorized entity,
the elected state official may, if requested by the senate president for a senate appointee or if requested by the
speaker of the house for a house appointee, appoint a member of a party other than the majority party instead
of a member of the majority party.
(b) Whenever an elected state official, as defined in 5-7-102, is required or authorized to appoint
more than one legislative member of the minority party to a statutorily recognized or authorized entity, the
elected state official may, if requested by the senate minority leader for a senate appointee or if requested by
the house minority leader for a house appointee, appoint a member of a party other than the minority party or
majority party instead of a member of the minority party.
(3) If a vacancy occurs in the membership of a committee, subcommittee, or statutorily recognized
or authorized entity because of the resignation or disqualification of a member appointed under the provisions
of subsection (1) or (2), the appointing authority authorized or required to make an appointment to fill the
vacancy is subject to the provisions of subsections (1) and (2).
(4) If an individual appointed under subsection (1) or (2) is not a member of either the majority
party or minority party and resigns from or is otherwise disqualified from serving, the appointing authority shall
fill the vacancy under the provisions of subsection (1) or (2) as if the appointment were an initial appointment,
and the appointing authority is not required to fill the vacancy with an individual who is a member of the same
party of which the individual whose resignation or disqualification caused the vacancy.
(5) The appointing authority for an interim committee provided for in Title 5 and composed of nine
or more members shall appoint members in a manner that reflects the majority and minority composition of the
legislature as provided in 5-5-211(5)(b) through (5)(d)."

Section 3. Section 5-16-101, MCA, is amended to read:
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 188

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 188.1
"5-16-101. Appointment and composition. The environmental quality council consists of 17
members as follows:
(1) the governor or the governor's designated representative is an ex officio member of the council
and shall participate in council meetings as a nonvoting member;
(2) six members of the senate and six members of the house of representatives appointed before
the 50th legislative day in the same manner as standing committees of the respective houses are appointed.
Four of the appointees of each house must be members of the majority party and two appointees of each
house must be members of the minority party provided in 5-5-211(5)(b) through (5)(d).
(3) four members of the general public. Two public members must be appointed by the speaker of
the house with the consent of the house minority leader, and two must be appointed by the president of the
senate with the consent of the senate minority leader."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Retroactive applicability. [This act] applies retroactively, within the
meaning of 1-2-109, to interim committee appointments made on or before [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 188